District of Columbia statutes.
42-1123

Separability clause.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid the remainder of this chapter, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

History

Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 17, Pub. L. 87-408, title III, § 323

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-943.
1973 Ed., § 45-743.